Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-413
Health care facility, defined.

Health care facility means an ambulatory surgical center, an assisted-living facility, a center or group home for the developmentally disabled, a critical access hospital, a general acute hospital, a health clinic, a hospital, an intermediate care facility, an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities, a long-term care hospital, a mental health substance use treatment center, a nursing facility, a PACE center, a pharmacy, a psychiatric or mental hospital, a public health clinic, a rehabilitation hospital, or a skilled nursing facility.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 52;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 6.